Washington statutes.
RCW 9A.50.020

Interference with health care facility.

It is unlawful for a person except as otherwise protected by state or federal law, alone or in concert with others, to willfully or recklessly interfere with access to or from a health care facility or willfully or recklessly disrupt the normal functioning of such facility by:

(1) Physically obstructing or impeding the free passage of a person seeking to enter or depart from the facility or from the common areas of the real property upon which the facility is located;

(2) Making noise that unreasonably disturbs the peace within the facility;

(3) Trespassing on the facility or the common areas of the real property upon which the facility is located;

(4) Telephoning the facility repeatedly, or knowingly permitting any telephone under his or her control to be used for such purpose; or

(5) Threatening to inflict injury on the owners, agents, patients, employees, or property of the facility or knowingly permitting any telephone under his or her control to be used for such purpose.

[ 1993 c 128 s 3.]